District of Columbia statutes.
48-853.08

Immunity from liability.

(a)

The Director and the employees of the Department shall not be liable for any civil damages resulting from the accuracy or inaccuracy of any information reported, compiled, or maintained by the Program pursuant to this chapter.

(b)

The Director and the employees of the Department shall not be liable for any civil damages resulting from the disclosure of or failure to disclose any information in compliance with this chapter and the Department’s regulations.

(c)

In the absence of gross negligence or willful misconduct, prescribers or dispensers complying in good faith with the reporting requirements of this chapter shall not be liable for any civil damages for any act or omission resulting from the submission of such required reports.

History

Feb. 22, 2014, D.C. Law 20-66, § 9, 61 DCR 7